Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE F. MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 8437. BELLA VISTA MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICT

Sec. 8437.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "district" means the Bella Vista Municipal Utility District.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 484 (S.B. 1481), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 8437.002. REMOVAL OF AREA FROM EMERGENCY SERVICES DISTRICT. (a) This section applies only to:

(1) a municipality with a population of less than 100,000; and

(2) an emergency services district operating under Chapter 775, Health and Safety Code, in which the district is wholly or partly located.

(b) If the district enters into a strategic partnership agreement with a municipality under Section 43.0751, Local Government Code, that includes the provision of fire-fighting services as defined by Section 49.351(k), Water Code, and the district has completed all other procedures necessary for a limited-purpose annexation by that municipality, an emergency services district shall disannex the territory of the district to be served by the municipality under the agreement in accordance with Subsection (c).

(c) The territory remains part of the emergency services district until the secretary of the emergency services district board receives from the district notice that the requirements of Subsection (b) have been met. On receipt of the notice, the board shall immediately change its records to show that the district territory has been disannexed from the emergency services district and shall cease to provide further services to the residents of that territory.

(d) Sections 775.022(b), (c), (d), (e), (e-1), and (f), Health and Safety Code, apply to a disannexation under this section, as if the disannexation occurred under the provisions of Section 775.022(a), Health and Safety Code.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 484 (S.B. 1481), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 618 (S.B. 1083), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.